nl: Wielblok grip functies: Antislipribbels; Coating met hoge wrijving; Geen toegevoegde gripkenmerken; Rubberen basispad; Gekartelde randen; Spikes/ijsklemmen; Loopvlak met textuur; Overig
lt-LT: Ratų kaladėlių sukibimo ypatybės: Neslystantys rantai; Didelės trinties danga; Be papildomų sukibimo savybių; Guminis pagrindo padas; Dantyti kraštai; Su spygliais / ledo kabliukais; Tekstūruotas protektoriaus paviršius; Kita
fr: Caractéristiques d’adhérence de la cale de roue: Stries antidérapantes; Revêtement à forte friction; Aucune caractéristique d’adhérence ajoutée; Coussinet de base en caoutchouc; Bords dentelés; Crampons à glace/à pointes; Surface de roulement texturée; Autre
es: Características del agarre del calzo para ruedas: Bordes antideslizantes; Revestimiento de alta fricción; Sin características de agarre adicionales; Almohadilla de base de goma; Bordes dentados; Con clavos/tacos para hielo; Superficie de banda de rodadura texturizada; Otro
ru: Особенности сцепления противооткатного упора: Противоскользящие ребра; Покрытие с высоким коэффициентом трения; Без дополнительных элементов сцепления; Резиновая накладка на основание; Зазубренные края; Шипы/ледоступы; Текстурированная поверхность протектора; Другое
de: Haftungsmerkmale des Radkeils: Antirutsch-Rillen; Haftbeschichtung; Keine zusätzlichen Griffeigenschaften; Gummiunterlage; Gezackte Kanten; Spikes/Eiskrallen; Strukturierte Lauffläche; Andere
pt-BR: Calço de roda recursos de aderência: Nervuras antiderrapantes; Revestimento de alto atrito; Sem recursos de aderência adicionados; Base de borracha; Bordas serrilhadas; Travas com cravos/gelo; Superfície de banda de rodagem texturizada; Outro
pl: Cechy przyczepności klina pod koło: Antypoślizgowe wypustki; Powłoka o wysokim tarciu; Brak dodatkowych elementów zwiększających przyczepność; Gumowa podkładka; Ząbkowane krawędzie; Kolce/raki na lód; Teksturowana powierzchnia bieżnika; Inne
it: Caratteristiche del bloccaruota: Rilievi antiscivolo; Rivestimento ad alto attrito; Nessuna caratteristica di presa aggiunta; Cuscinetto di base in gomma; Bordi seghettati; Punte/chiodi da ghiaccio; Superficie del battistrada testurizzata; Altro
hr-HR: Značajke prianjanja klinova za kotače: Rebra protiv klizanja; Premaz visokog trenja; Bez dodatnih značajki prianjanja; Gumeni bazni jastučić; Nazubljeni rubovi; Šiljci / kopče za led; Teksturirana površina gaznog sloja; Ostalo
en: Wheel chock grip features: Anti-slip ridges; High-friction coating; No added grip features; Rubber base pad; Serrated edges; Spiked/ice cleats; Textured tread surface; Other
tr: Tekerlek takozu tutuş özellikleri: Kaymaz çıkıntılar; Yüksek sürtünmeli kaplama; Ek kavrama özelliği yok; Kauçuk taban pedi; Tırtıklı kenarlar; Çivili/buz kramponları; Dokulu sırt yüzeyi; Diğer
pt-PT: Características de aderência do calço de roda: Estrias antiderrapantes; Revestimento de alta fricção; Sem características de aderência adicionadas; Base em borracha; Bordos serrilhados; Espigões/presilhas para gelo; Superfície de piso texturizada; Outro
vi: Đặc điểm của kẹp chặn bánh xe: Rãnh chống trượt; Lớp phủ ma sát cao; Không có thêm tính năng tăng độ bám; Đệm đế cao su; Cạnh răng cưa; Gai/đinh đi trên băng; Bề mặt gai có vân; Khác
ko: 바퀴 고임목 그립 특징: 미끄럼 방지 융기부; 고마찰 코팅; 그립 추가 기능 없음; 고무 베이스 패드; 톱니 모양 모서리; 스파이크/아이스 클릿; 질감이 있는 트레드 표면; 기타
ja: ホイールチョックグリップ特徴: 滑り止め突起; 高摩擦コーティング; 追加グリップ機能なし; ラバーベースパッド; 鋸歯状エッジ; スパイク/アイスクリート; テクスチャードトレッド面; その他
bg-BG: Характеристики на сцеплението на клин за колела: Ръбове против плъзгане; Покритие с високо триене; Без допълнителни елементи за сцепление; Гумена основа; Назъбени ръбове; С шипове/за лед; Текстурирана повърхност; Друго
el: Χαρακτηριστικά πρόσφυσης τάκων τροχού: Αντιολισθητικές ραβδώσεις; Επίστρωση υψηλής τριβής; Χωρίς πρόσθετα χαρακτηριστικά πρόσφυσης; Λαστιχένια βάση; Οδοντωτά άκρα; Καρφιά/σχαράκια πάγου; Ανάγλυφη επιφάνεια πέλματος; Άλλο
zh-CN: 轮子垫块抓地功能: 防滑脊; 高摩擦涂层; 无附加抓地特性; 橡胶底垫; 锯齿边缘; 尖刺/冰爪; 纹理胎面; 其他
fi: Pyöräkiilan pito-ominaisuudet: Liukuesteharjanteet; Suurikitkainen pinnoite; Ei lisättyjä pito-ominaisuuksia; Kuminen pohjalevy; Sahalaitaiset reunat; Piikit/jääpiikit; Kuvioitu kulutuspinta; Muu
sl-SI: Lastnosti oprijema zagozde za kolesa: Nedrseči grebeni; Premaz z visokim trenjem; Brez dodatnih funkcij oprijema; Gumijasta podloga; Nazobčani robovi; Konice/dereze za led; Teksturirana naležna površina; Drugo
hu: Kerék tapadási jellemzői: Csúszásgátló bordák; Magas súrlódású bevonat; Nincs extra tapadás; Gumi alátét; Fogazott szélek; Tüskés/Jégkarmok; Texturált futófelület; Egyéb
sk-SK: Funkcie uchytenia klinu pre kolesá: Protišmykové drážky; Povlak s vysokým trením; Bez pridaných prvkov úchopu; Gumená podložka; Zúbkované okraje; Hroty/protišmykové úchyty na ľad; Štruktúrovaný povrch dezénu; Iné
zh-TW: 車輪擋抓地力功能: 防滑紋理; 高摩擦力塗層; 無附加抓地力功能; 橡膠底墊; 鋸齒狀邊緣; 釘狀/防滑冰爪; 紋理胎面表面; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติการยึดของตัวล็อกล้อ: ร่องกันลื่น; เคลือบสารเพิ่มแรงเสียดทาน; ไม่มีคุณสมบัติการยึดเกาะเพิ่มเติม; แผ่นยางรองฐาน; ขอบหยัก; หนามเตย/ตุ่มกันลื่นบนน้ำแข็ง; พื้นผิวสัมผัสขรุขระ; อื่นๆ
da: Grebsegenskaber for hjulklods: Skridsikre riller; Højfriktionsbelægning; Ingen ekstra grebsfunktioner; Gummibasepude; Takkede kanter; Pigge/isbeslag; Tekstureret trædeflade; Andet
ro-RO: Caracteristici de aderență ale saboților de roată: Striații antiderapante; Acoperire cu frecare ridicată; Fără caracteristici suplimentare de aderență; Suport de bază din cauciuc; Margini zimțate; Cu țepi/crampoane pentru gheață; Suprafață de rulare texturată; Altele
nb: Stoppklossens gripeegenskaper: Sklisikre riller; Høyfriksjonsbelegg; Ingen ekstra gripefunksjoner; Gummipute; Takkede kanter; Pigger/isbrodder; Teksturert slitebane; Annet
sv: Hjulklossarnas greppfunktioner: Halkskyddsräfflor; Friktionsbeläggning; Inga tillagda greppfunktioner; Gummibas; Tandade kanter; Broddar/ispiggar; Texturerad slitbana; Övrigt
cs: Prvky přilnavosti/protiskluzové vlastnosti zakládacího klínu: Protiskluzové drážky; Povrch s vysokým třením; Bez prvků pro zvýšení přilnavosti; Gumová základní podložka; Zoubkované hrany; Hroty / protiskluzové návleky na led; Texturovaný povrch běhounu; Jiné